Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXII Ownership and Conveyance of Property
CHAPTER 382 Conveyances and Encumbrances
382.230.
Conveyance not void because of error of clerk — Validation of prior certification and proof.

No conveyance of real property shall be void or invalid because of a failure by the county clerk to incorporate in his certificate to such conveyance an endorsement of acknowledgment made by his deputy thereon.

When acknowledgments to conveyances of real property have been taken by a deputy clerk, and a note or memorandum thereof endorsed by him on the conveyance, and a certificate of such acknowledgment has been afterward written out by the principal clerk and signed by him as having been done by such deputy or as if the acknowledgment had been before such principal clerk, such conveyance and certificate, and the recording thereof, shall be valid although the note or memorandum made by the deputy was not copied into the certificate.

No conveyance of real property certified, proven or lodged for record prior to June 17, 1924, shall be void or invalid because it was not certified, proven, or lodged for record as required by the law in force at the time, if it was certified or proven in the manner prescribed by the Act of 1910 c 82, or by KRS

382.130

or

382.150

.

HISTORY:

514; 2019 ch. 86, § 39, effective January 1, 2020.

382.240.
Delivery of recorded instruments — Destruction of unclaimed instruments.

Each instrument that is recorded shall be delivered to the party entitled thereto. The county clerk shall require prepayment of postage and a three dollar ($3) reimbursement for delivery of said instruments at the time they are left for record in his office. If the county clerk is unable to locate the parties entitled thereto, he shall retain the instruments for at least one (1) year. The clerk may then destroy the instruments.

HISTORY:

519: amend. Acts 1982, ch. 323, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; 2019 ch. 86, § 44, effective January 1, 2020.

Opinions of Attorney General.

After the survivor or new corporation sends one of the triplicate originals of the articles of corporate merger or consolidation to the county clerk for filing and recording, and after the clerk so records the instrument, the clerk must deliver the triplicate original to the survivor or new corporation, pursuant to this section. Where the clerk cannot locate the party or parties entitled to such instrument, he shall retain such instrument for at least two (2) years, after which he may destroy the instrument, provided he enters the required notice in the newspaper; the county clerk cannot retain such recorded instrument where the person entitled to the instrument is known and located.

OAG 83-18

.

382.250.
Acknowledgment before deputy clerk — Duty of clerk.

If the deputy of any county clerk takes the acknowledgment of a deed or other instrument, and writes thereon the certificate of acknowledgment, the instrument or deed, together with the certificate of the deputy, shall be recorded. If the deputy only endorses a memorandum of the acknowledgment on the deed or instrument, then the principal clerk shall write the certificate as if the acknowledgment had been taken before him, and the deed or instrument shall be as valid as if the certificate had been written in full by the deputy.

History.

515.

382.260.
Deed not legally lodged for record unless tax paid.

No deed shall be held to be legally lodged for record until the tax is paid thereon.

History.

520.

382.270.
Instruments not valid against purchasers or creditors unless acknowledged or proved — Exemption for instruments otherwise lodged for record.

Except as otherwise provided in KRS

382.285

, no deed or deed of trust or mortgage conveying a legal or equitable title to real property shall be lodged for record and, thus, valid against a purchaser for a valuable consideration, without notice thereof, or against creditors, until such deed or mortgage is acknowledged or proved according to law. However, if a deed or deed of trust or mortgage conveying a legal or equitable title to real property is not so acknowledged or proved according to law, but is or has been otherwise lodged for record, such deed or deed of trust or mortgage conveying a legal or equitable title to real property or creating a mortgage lien on real property shall be deemed to be validly lodged for record for purposes of KRS Chapter 382, and all interested parties shall be on constructive notice of the contents thereof.

As used in this section, “creditors” includes all creditors irrespective of whether or not they have acquired a lien by legal or equitable proceedings or by voluntary conveyance.

HISTORY:

496: amend. Acts 1962, ch. 83, § 16; 2006, ch. 183, § 16, effective July 12, 2006; 2010, ch. 155, § 2, effective July 15, 2010; 2022 ch. 167, § 1, effective July 14, 2022.

382.280.
Order in which deeds and mortgages take effect.

Except as otherwise provided in KRS

382.077

and

382.285

, all bona fide deeds of trust or mortgages shall take effect in the order that they are legally acknowledged or proved and lodged for record.

HISTORY:

497; 2019 ch. 86, § 42, effective January 1, 2020; 2022 ch. 167, § 2, effective July 14, 2022.

382.285.
Purchase money deed of trust of mortgage granted by the purchaser — Priority over prior lien.

A purchase money deed of trust or mortgage granted by a purchaser shall have priority over a prior lien under KRS

426.720

against the purchaser.

HISTORY:

2022 ch. 167, § 3, effective July 14, 2022.

382.290.
Recording of mortgages and deeds retaining liens — Assignment — Discharge — Form of record — Clerk’s fee.

In recording mortgages and deeds in which liens are retained (except railroad mortgages securing bonds payable to bearer), there shall be left a blank space immediately after the record of the deed or mortgage of at least two (2) full lines for each note or obligation named in the deed or mortgage, or in the alternative, at the option of the county clerk, a marginal entry record may be kept for the same purposes as the blank space. Each entry in the marginal entry record shall be linked to its respective referenced instrument in the indexing system for the referenced instruments.

No county clerk or deputy county clerk shall admit to record any mortgage or deed in which liens are retained unless the mortgage or deed in which a lien is retained plainly specifies and refers to the immediate source from which the mortgagor or grantor derived title to the property or the interest encumbered therein.

When any note named in any deed or mortgage is assigned to any other person, the assignor may, over his own hand, attested by the clerk, note such assignment in the blank space, or in a marginal entry record, beside a listing of the book and page of the document being assigned, and when any one (1) or more of the notes named in any deed or mortgage is paid, or otherwise released or satisfied, the holder of the note, and who appears from the record to be such holder, may release the lien, so far as such note is concerned, by release, over his own hand, attested by the clerk. Each entry in the marginal entry record shall be linked to its respective referenced instrument in the indexing system for the referenced instrument.

No person who does not, from such record or assignment of record, appear at the time to be the legal holder of any note secured by lien in any deed or mortgage, shall be permitted to release the lien securing any such note, and any release made in contravention of this section shall be void; but this section does not change the existing law if no such entry is made.

For each assignment and release so made and attested by the clerk, he may charge a fee pursuant to KRS

64.012

to be paid by the person executing the release or noting the assignment.

If such assignment of a note is made by separate instrument or by deed assigning the note, or in a marginal entry record, the instrument of writing or deed or marginal entry record shall set forth the date of notes assigned, a brief description of notes, the name and post office address of assignee, and the deed book and page of the instrument wherein the lien or mortgage is recorded and the clerk or deputy clerk receiving such instrument of writing or deed of assignment for record shall at the option of the county clerk immediately either link the assignment and its filing location to its respective referenced instrument in the indexing system for the referenced instrument, or endorse at the foot of the record in the space provided in subsection (1) of this section, “The notes mentioned herein (giving a brief description of notes assigned) have been transferred and assigned to (insert name and address of assignee) by deed of assignment (or describe instrument) dated and recorded in deed book . . . . . page . . . . . ,” and attest such certificate. For making such notation on the record the clerk shall be allowed a fee pursuant to KRS

64.012

for each notation so made, to be paid by the party filing the instrument of writing or deed of assignment.

No holder of a note secured by lien retained in either deed or mortgage shall lodge for record, and no clerk or deputy clerk shall receive and permit to be lodged for record, any deed or instrument of writing that does not comply with the provisions of this section.

History.

498a: amend. Acts 1978, ch. 84, § 15, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 323, § 2, effective July 15, 1982; 2015 ch. 65, § 1, effective June 24, 2015; 2016 ch. 11, § 3, effective July 15, 2016.

382.295.
Recording master form for mortgages — Incorporation by reference of contents.

An instrument containing forms of covenants, conditions, obligations, powers, and other clauses of a mortgage may be recorded in the county clerk’s office of any county, and the county clerk of such county, upon the request of any person, on tender of the lawful fees therefor, shall record the same. Every such instrument shall be entitled on the face thereof as a “Master form recorded by . . . . . (name of person causing the instrument to be recorded).” The instrument need not be acknowledged to be entitled to record.

When any such instrument is recorded, the county clerk shall index the instrument under the name of the person causing it to be recorded in the manner provided for miscellaneous instruments relating to real estate.

After the form mentioned in subsection (1) of this section is recorded, any of the provisions of such master form instrument may be incorporated by reference in any mortgage of real estate situated within this state, if the reference in the mortgage states that the master form instrument was recorded in the county in which the mortgage is offered for record and states the date when and the book and page or pages where the master form instrument was recorded. The recording of any mortgage which has so incorporated by reference therein any of the provisions of a master form instrument recorded as provided in this section shall have like effect as if the provisions of the master form so incorporated by reference had been set forth fully in the mortgage.

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 88, §§ 1-3.

382.297.
Amendment of recorded mortgage by affidavit of amendment.

A recorded mortgage may be amended by an affidavit of amendment prepared by an attorney to correct clerical errors or omitted information. An affidavit of amendment may not change any term, dollar amount, or interest rate in the mortgage, unless signed by the mortgagor and secured party. An affidavit of amendment may not change the parties or the collateral of a recorded mortgage, but may be used to correct a manifest clerical or typographical error such as spelling, punctuation, or numbering mistakes in typing or printing. The attorney preparing the affidavit shall certify in the affidavit that notice of filing the amendment has been given to the mortgagor by mailing a copy of the amendment to the mortgagor at the address shown on the original mortgage. A subsequent release of the mortgage releases any amendments to the original mortgage.

History.

Enact. Acts 2006, ch. 183, § 19, effective July 12, 2006; 2015 ch. 65, § 2, effective June 24, 2015; 2016 ch. 11, § 4, effective July 15, 2016.

382.300.
Duty of clerk concerning instruments lodged for record — Reproduction of clerk’s signature on photographic copy.

Every county clerk shall record all deeds, mortgages and powers of attorney that are lodged for record, properly certified, or that are acknowledged or proved before him as required by law. He shall also record the certificates endorsed on such instrument, and shall certify the time when the instrument was lodged in his office for record. If acknowledged or proved before him, he shall also certify the time of acknowledgment or proof, and by whom proved, and that the instrument and the certificate thereon have been duly recorded in his office.

Whenever, either heretofore or hereafter, any recordable instrument of writing bearing the certificate of the clerk showing its recording shall have been copied of record by any photographic, photocopying, or other mechanical process for reproducing on the record the instrument and certificate, the clerk’s signature, by either the clerk or his deputy, so reproduced with such certificate shall have the same effect as if subscribed by the clerk on the record.

History.

511: amend. Acts 1952, ch. 123, effective June 19, 1952.

382.310.
Clerk may complete acknowledgment and record of predecessor.

If the office of any county clerk has been vacated, leaving therein any instrument unrecorded, which from an official endorsement thereon appears to have been acknowledged or proved in part, his successor may receive the complete acknowledgment and record the same, stating the facts in his certificate. If any such instrument appears to have been acknowledged or proved ready for record, or to have been acknowledged or proved before another officer, and certified according to law, and lodged in his office for record, or is produced to his successor for record, the successor of such clerk shall record the instrument, making his certificate conform to the facts.

History.

510.

382.320.
Clerk may correct errors and omissions of predecessor.

If the office of any county clerk has been vacated, leaving any instrument recorded in his office, the original of which has never been taken therefrom, and in the record of which, or the authentication thereof, there is a deviation from the original, the successor shall correct such record by making it an exact copy of the original instrument and authentication.

Whenever the clerk who has vacated his office has failed to put his name to the certificate on any instrument which he has recorded, or to the record thereof, and the original has not been removed from his office, the successor shall sign the name of his predecessor to the certificate, and shall make a note on the record at the foot of the certificate, of any act so done.

History.

509.

382.330.
Instrument not to be recorded unless date of maturity shown — Exception.

No county clerk shall record a deed or deed of trust or mortgage covering real property by which the payment of any indebtedness is secured unless the deed or deed of trust or mortgage states the date and the maturity of the obligations thereby secured which have been already issued or which are to be issued forthwith. In the case of obligations due on demand, the requirement of stating the maturity thereof shall be satisfied by stating that such obligations are “due on demand.”

History.

511a-1: amend. Acts 1962, ch. 83, § 17; 1978, ch. 373, § 1, effective June 17, 1978.

382.335.
Certain information to be included in instruments in order for them to be recorded.

No county clerk shall receive or permit the recording of any instrument by which the title to real estate or personal property, or any interest therein or lien thereon, is conveyed, granted, encumbered, assigned, or otherwise disposed of; nor receive any instrument or permit any instrument, provided by law, to be recorded as evidence of title to real estate, unless the instrument has endorsed on it, a printed, typewritten, or stamped statement showing the name and address of the individual who prepared the instrument, and the statement is signed by the individual. The person who prepared the instrument may execute his or her signature by affixing a facsimile of his or her signature on the instrument. This subsection shall not apply to any instrument executed or acknowledged prior to July 1, 1962.

No county clerk shall receive or permit the recording of any instrument by which the title to real estate or any interest therein is conveyed, granted, assigned, or otherwise disposed of unless the instrument contains the mailing address of the grantee or assignee. This subsection shall not apply to any instrument executed or acknowledged prior to July 1, 1970.

This section shall not apply to wills or to statutory liens in favor of the Commonwealth.

No county clerk shall receive, or permit the recording of, any instrument by which real estate, or any interest therein, is conveyed, granted, assigned, transferred, or otherwise disposed of unless the instrument complies with the official indexing system of the county. The indexing system shall have been in place for at least twenty-four (24) months prior to July 15, 1994 or shall be implemented for the purpose of allowing computerized searching for the instruments of record of the county clerk. If a county clerk requires a parcel identification number on an instrument before recording, the clerk shall provide a computer terminal, at no charge to the public, for use in finding the parcel identification number. The county clerk may make reasonable rules about the use of the computer terminal, requests for a parcel identification number, or both.

The receipt for record and recording of any instrument by the county clerk without compliance with the provisions of this section shall not prevent the record of filing of the instrument from becoming notice as otherwise provided by law, nor impair the admissibility of the record as evidence.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 23; 1970, ch. 164, § 1; 1972, ch. 134, § 1; 1990, ch. 164, § 3, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 293, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 2010, ch. 133, § 72, effective July 15, 2010; 2010, ch. 151, § 113, effective January 1, 2011.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(1/1/2011). This section was amended by 2010 Ky. Acts chs. 133 and 151, which are virtually identical and have been codified together.

382.337.
Filing of affidavit to correct or supplement certain information contained in deed.

Any party to a deed or the attorney who prepared the deed or other persons with personal knowledge may execute and file with the county clerk his or her affidavit to correct or supplement information regarding the marital status of any party to a deed, or to supplement or correct information contained in or absent from the acknowledgment or notary portion of a deed, and for no other purpose. Nothing in this section is intended to replace any existing statutory requirement regarding the execution and filing of deeds. The affidavit shall contain the name, address, and signature of the person who prepared the instrument as required by KRS

382.335

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2006, ch. 183, § 20, effective July 12, 2006.

382.340.
Mortgages executed by public utility corporations — Recording — Effect.

Mortgages executed by corporations, authorized to operate railroads, motor transportation lines, electric light, heat and power plants, water plants, telegraph and telephone lines, pipelines for the transportation or distribution of natural or manufactured gas, or a mixture of same, which cover rights-of-way, franchises, pipelines, pole lines, easements, railroad tracks, engines, cars, motor equipment or any tangible personal property, or after-acquired property of whatever kind, may create a lien upon such property, or any interest therein, and may secure all renewals and extensions of any loan secured thereby and the note evidencing the same, and may secure any additional indebtedness whether direct, indirect, existing, future, contingent or otherwise, to the extent authorized by the mortgage or deed of trust, if the mortgage by its terms stipulates the maximum additional indebtedness which may be secured thereby. All such mortgages which cover rights-of-way, franchises, pipelines, pole lines, easements, railroad tracks, engines, motor equipment or any tangible personal property shall be duly acknowledged as required by law and recorded as mortgages on real estate are required to be recorded only in the county in Kentucky in which the principal office of the corporation is located.

If the mortgage covers other real property in addition to rights-of-way, franchises, pipelines, pole lines, easements, railroad tracks, engines, cars, motor equipment or tangible personal property, then the mortgage shall also be recorded in each county in which such other real property is located.

When such mortgage is lodged for record, as herein provided, it shall be effective against purchasers for a valuable consideration without notice and against creditors as defined in KRS

382.270

.

History.

495a-4: amend. Acts 1942, ch. 101, § 1; 1960, ch. 250, § 2; 1964, ch. 118, § 2; 1966, ch. 164, § 2; 1968, ch. 121, § 1; 1968, ch. 152, § 157.

382.350.
Removal of property from land covered by lien.

Any person who, with actual or constructive notice of a recorded real property mortgage or vendor’s lien, and without the written consent of the record holder thereof, purchases, severs or removes from the land covered by the mortgage or lien, any standing timber, buildings, minerals, or improvements in the nature of fixtures real, covered by and included in the mortgage or lien, and who converts such property to his own use, shall take such property subject to the mortgage or vendor’s liens, and the respective priorities thereof, and shall be liable to the holders of the mortgages or liens for a return of such property or for the reasonable market value thereof at the time of the purchase or severance or removal and conversion thereof at the option of the holder of the mortgage or lien. But no holder of a mortgage or a vendor’s lien shall recover more than the amount of the indebtedness secured by his mortgage or vendor’s lien, and any amount recovered by the holder of the mortgage or vendor’s lien shall be credited on the indebtedness secured thereby.

History.

498b.

382.360.
Discharge of liens by deed or mortgage — Assignment of mortgage — Effect.

Liens by deed or mortgage may be discharged by an entry acknowledging their satisfaction on the margin of the record thereof, or in the alternative, at the option of the county clerk, in a marginal entry record, signed by the person entitled thereto, or his or her personal representative or agent, and attested by the clerk, or may be discharged by a separate deed of release, which shall recite the date of the instrument and deed book and the page wherein it is recorded. Such release in the case of a mortgage or deed of trust shall have the effect to reinstate the title in the mortgagor or grantor or person entitled thereto. Each entry in the marginal entry record shall be linked to its respective referenced instrument in the indexing system for the referenced instruments.

If a lien or mortgage is released by a deed of release, the clerk shall immediately, at the option of the clerk, either link the release and its filing location to its respective referenced instrument in the indexing system for the referenced instrument, or endorse on the margin of the record wherein the lien is retained “Released by deed of release (stating whether in whole or in part) lodged for record (giving date, deed book and page wherein such deed of release may be found)” and the clerk shall also attest such certificate.

When a mortgage is assigned to another person, the assignee shall file the assignment for recording with the county clerk within thirty (30) days of the assignment and the county clerk shall attest the assignment and shall note the assignment in the blank space, or in a marginal entry record, beside a listing of the book and page of the document being assigned. Provided, however, that an assignee that reassigns the note prior to the thirtieth day after first acquiring the assignment may request that the subsequent assignee file the unfiled assignment with the new reassignment.

Delivering an assignment to the assignee or a lien release to the mortgagor shall not substitute for filing the assignment or release with the county clerk, as required by this section.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, nothing in this chapter shall require the legal holder of any note secured by lien in any deed or mortgage to file a release of any mortgage when the mortgage securing such paid note also secures a note or other obligation which remains unpaid.

Failure of an assignee to record a mortgage assignment shall not affect the validity or perfection, or invalidity or lack of perfection, of a mortgage lien under applicable law.

HISTORY:

498: amend. Acts 1982, ch. 323, § 3, effective July 15, 1982; 2006, ch. 183, § 17, effective July 12, 2006; 2019 ch. 86, § 45, effective January 1, 2020.

382.365.
Release of lien, with notice to property owner, within thirty days of satisfaction — Assignments of liens — Proceeding against lienholder in District Court or Circuit Court — Liability of lienholder when lien not released or notice not sent — Notice to state or lienholder — Damages.

A holder of a lien on real property, including a lien provided for in KRS

376.010

, shall release the lien in the county clerk’s office where the lien is recorded within thirty (30) days from the date of satisfaction.

An assignee of a lien on real property shall record the assignment in the county clerk’s office as required by KRS

382.360

. Failure of an assignee to record a mortgage assignment shall not affect the validity or perfection, or invalidity or lack of perfection, of a mortgage lien under applicable law.

A proceeding may be filed by any owner of real property or any party acquiring an interest in the real property in District Court or Circuit Court against a lienholder that violates subsection (1) or (2) of this section. A proceeding filed under this section shall be given precedence over other matters pending before the court.

Upon proof to the court of the lien being satisfied by payment in full to the final lienholder or final assignee, the court shall enter a judgment noting the identity of the final lienholder or final assignee and authorizing and directing the master commissioner of the court to execute and file with the county clerk the requisite release or assignments or both, as appropriate. The judgment shall be with costs including a reasonable attorney’s fee. If the court finds that the lienholder received written notice of its failure to release and lacked good cause for not releasing the lien, the lienholder shall be liable to the owner of the real property or to a party with an interest in the real property in the amount of one hundred dollars ($100) per day for each day, beginning on the fifteenth day after receipt of the written notice, of the violation for which good cause did not exist. This written notice shall be properly addressed and sent by certified mail or delivered in person to the final lienholder or final assignee as follows:

For a corporation, to an officer at the lienholder’s principal address or to an agent for process located in Kentucky; however, if the corporation is a foreign corporation and has not appointed an agent for process in Kentucky, then to the agent for process in the state of domicile of the corporation;

For an individual, to the individual at the address shown on the mortgage, at the lienholder’s residence or place of business, or at an address to which the lienholder has directed that correspondence or payoff be sent;

For a trust or an estate, to a fiduciary at the address shown on the mortgage or at an address to which the lienholder has directed that correspondence or payoff be sent; and

For any other entity, including but not limited to limited liability companies, partnerships, limited partnerships, limited liability partnerships, and associations, to an officer, partner, or member at the entity’s principal place of business or to an agent for process.

A lienholder that continues to fail to release a satisfied real estate lien, without good cause, within forty-five (45) days from the date of written notice shall be liable to the owner of the real property or to a party with an interest in the real property for an additional four hundred dollars ($400) per day for each day for which good cause did not exist after the forty-fifth day from the date of written notice, for a total of five hundred dollars ($500) per day for each day for which good cause did not exist after the forty-fifth day from the date of written notice. The lienholder shall also be liable for any actual expense including a reasonable attorney’s fee incurred by the owner or a party with an interest in the real property in securing the release of real property by such violation and in securing an award of damages. Damages under this subsection for failure to record an assignment pursuant to KRS 382.360(3) shall not exceed three (3) times the actual damages, plus attorney’s fees and court costs, but in no event less than five hundred dollars ($500).

The former holder of a lien on real property shall send by regular mail a copy of the lien release to the property owner at his or her last known address within seven (7) days of the release. A former lienholder that violates this subsection shall be liable to the owner of the real property for fifty dollars ($50) and any actual expense incurred by the owner in obtaining documentation of the lien release.

For the purposes of this section, “date of satisfaction” means that date of receipt by a holder of a lien on real property of a sum of money in the form of a certified check, cashier’s check, wired transferred funds, or other form of payment satisfactory to the lienholder that is sufficient to pay the principal, interest, and other costs owing on the obligation that is secured by the lien on the property.

The provisions of this section shall not apply when a lienholder is deceased and the estate of the lienholder has not been settled.

The state licensing agency, if applicable, or any holder of a lien on real property shall be notified of the disposition of any actions brought under this section against the lienholder.

The provisions of this section shall be held and construed as ancillary and supplemental to any other remedy provided by law.

If more than one (1) owner or party with an interest in the real property brings an action to recover damages under this section, any statutory damages shall be allocated equally among recovering parties in the absence of agreement otherwise among said parties. The entry of a judgment awarding damages shall bar a subsequent action by any other person or entity to recover damages for the same violation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 331, § 1, effective June 17, 1978; 1986, ch. 191, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1988, ch. 259, § 3, effective July 15, 1988; 1998, ch. 280, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 507, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 412, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2006, ch. 183, § 18, effective July 12, 2006.

382.370.
Power of attorney to convey or release property — Recording — Revocation.

Powers of attorney to convey or release real or personal property, or any interest therein, may be acknowledged, proved and recorded in the proper office, in the manner prescribed for recording conveyances. If the conveyance made under a power, is required by law to be recorded or lodged for record, to make the same valid against creditors and purchasers, then the power must be lodged or recorded in like manner, and no such power so recorded shall be deemed to be revoked by any act of the party by whom it was executed, except from the time when there has been lodged for record in the office in which the power is recorded a written revocation, executed and proved or acknowledged in the manner prescribed for conveyances, or a memorandum of revocation made on the margin of the record thereof, which memorandum is signed by the party executing the same, and attested by the clerk.

History.

499.

382.380.
Statement of amount and maturity to be filed before additional securities are issued.

If a deed of trust or mortgage is made to a trustee or to a mortgagee to secure the payment of bonds or other obligations to be issued thereafter, the grantor in the deed of trust or the mortgagor in the mortgage, when or before such additional bonds or other obligations are issued, shall cause to be recorded in the office of the county clerk of the county in which such deed of trust or mortgage was first recorded, a statement by the grantor or the mortgagor acknowledged as deeds are required to be acknowledged, setting forth the amount, the date, the maturity and the description of such additional obligations, and until such statement is so lodged for record no such bonds or other obligations shall be issued by the grantor or the mortgagor or certified by the trustee.

History.

511a-2.